Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2613
Rules and regulations.

The Department
of Revenue may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the
Convention Center Facility Financing Assistance Act.

Laws 2010, LB779, § 4.